en: Veal sausages, Veal Sausage
bg: Телешки колбаси
de: Kalbswürste
es: Salchichas de Ternera
fi: Vasikanmakkarat
fr: Saucisses de veau, Saucisse de veau
hr: Teleće kobasice
pl: Kiełbasy cielęce, Kiełbasa cielęca

en: Horse sausages
fr: Saucisses de cheval

en: Cooked horse sausages
fr: Saucisses de cheval cuites

en: Chicken sausages
bg: Пилешки колбаси
de: Hühnerwürste
es: salchicha de pollo
fi: kanamakkarat
fr: Saucisses de poulet
hr: Pileće kobasice
hu: Csirke kolbász
it: Salsicce di pollo
ja: 鶏のソーセージ
nl: Worst met kip
pl: Kiełbasy z kurczaka, Kiełbasa z kurczaka
zh: 鸡肠

en: Turkey sausages
bg: Пуешки колбаси
de: Truthahnwurst
es: salchicha de pavo
fi: kalkkunamakkarat
fr: Saucisses de dinde
hr: Pureće kobasice
hu: Pulyka kolbász
it: Salsicce di tacchino
ja: 七面鳥のソーセージ
nl: Kalkoenworst
pl: Kiełbasy z indyka, Kiełbasa z indyka

en: Poultry merguez
fr: Merguez de volaille
hr: Merguez od peradi
nl: Gevogelte-merguez

en: Mutton merguez
fr: Merguez de mouton
hr: Ovčetina merguez
nl: Schaapsvlees-merguez

en: Beef merguez
fr: Merguez de bœuf
hr: Goveđi merguez
nl: Rundvlees-merguez

en: Pure beef merguez sausage
fr: Merguez pur bœuf

en: Beef and mutton merguez sausages
fr: Merguez de boeuf et mouton

en: Cooked beef and mutton merguez sausages
fr: Merguez de boeuf et mouton cuites

en: Beef mutton and pork merguez sausage
fr: Merguez bœuf mouton et porc

en: Pork and beef merguez sausage
fr: Merguez de porc et bœuf

en: Cervelat, Saveloy
de: Zervelatwurst
fr: Cervelas
hr: Cervelat
nl: Cervelaten, Cervelaat

en: Saveloy from Obernai Alsace, Cervelas from Obernai Alsace
fr: Cervelas d'Alsace, cervelas obernois, Cervelas à l'alsacienne

en: Pure pork saveloy with garlic, Pure pork cervelat with garlic
fr: Cervelas à l'ail pur porc

en: Pork brain
fr: Cervelle de porc

en: Braised pork brain
fr: Cervelle de porc braisée

en: German sausages
de: Deutsche Würste
es: Salchichas alemanas
fi: saksalaiset makkarat
fr: Saucisses allemandes, Saucisses d'Allemagne
hr: Njemačke kobasice
hu: Német kolbász
it: Salsicce tedesche
nl: Duitse worsten
pl: Kiełbasa Niemiecka

en: Frankfurter sausages, Frankfurter sausage
de: Frankfurter Würstchen
es: salchichas Frankfurt, frankfurt
fi: Nakkimakkarat, Nakkimakkara
fr: Saucisses de Francfort, Saucisse de Francfort
hr: Frankfurtske kobasice
it: Salsicce di Francoforte
nl: Frankfurter worsten
pl: Frankfurterki